ko: 소프트웨어 > 디지털 상품/화폐: 컴퓨터 아이콘; 바탕화면 배경; 디지털 아트워크; 문서 템플릿; 글꼴; 사진 편집 프리셋 및 LUT; SVG 및 컷 파일; 스톡 사진/동영상; 가상 화폐
ro-RO: Software > Bunuri și monede digitale: Pictograme; Imagini de fundal pentru desktop; Lucrări de artă digitală; Modele de documente; Fonturi; Presetări și LUT-uri pentru editare foto; SVG și fișiere de decupare; Fotografii și înregistrări video de stoc; Monede virtuale
fr: Logiciels > Biens et monnaie virtuels: Icônes d'ordinateur; Fonds d'écran de bureau; Illustrations numériques; Modèles de documents; Polices; Préréglages de retouche photo et LUT; Fichiers SVG et de découpe; Photos et vidéos de stock; Devise virtuelle
da: Software > Digitale varer og valuta: Computerikoner; Skrivebordsbaggrunde; Digitale kunstværker; Dokumentskabeloner; Skrifttyper; Forudindstillinger og LUT'er til billedredigering; SVG- og skærefiler; Fotobibliotek; Virtuel valuta
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Skaitmeninės prekės ir valiuta: Kompiuterių piktogramos; Darbalaukio fonai; Skaitmeniniai meno kūriniai; Dokumentų šablonai; Šriftai; Nuotraukų redagavimo išankstiniai nustatymai ir LUT; SVG ir pjaustymo failai; Standartinės nuotraukos ir filmuota medžiaga; Virtuali valiuta
hu: Szoftver > Digitális áruk és valuta: Számítógépes ikonok; Asztali háttérképek; Digitális műalkotás; Dokumentumsablonok; Betűtípusok; Képszerkesztő előbeállítások és LUT-ok; SVG- és vágófájlok; Készletfotók és videófelvételek; Virtuális valuta
pt-BR: Software > Software de conteúdo digital: Ícones para computador; Papéis de parede da área de trabalho; Arte digital; Modelos de documentos; Fontes; Predefinições e LUTs para edição de fotos; SVG e arquivos de corte; Banco de imagens e vídeos; Moeda virtual
ru: Программное обеспечение > Цифровые товары и валюта: Компьютерные значки; Обои для рабочего стола; Художественные цифровые изображения; Шаблоны документов; Шрифты; Пресеты и LUT для редактирования фото; SVG и файлы для резки; Стоковые фотографии и видео; Виртуальная валюта
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > สินค้าและสกุลเงินดิจิทัล: ไอคอนคอมพิวเตอร์; วอลเปเปอร์เดสก์ท็อป; ดิจิทัลอาร์ตเวิร์ก; เทมเพลตเอกสาร; ฟอนต์; พรีเซ็ตและ LUT แต่งภาพ; ไฟล์ SVG และไฟล์ตัด; คลังรูปภาพและฟุตเทจวิดีโอ; สกุลเงินเสมือน
bg-BG: Софтуер > Цифрови стоки и валута: Компютърни икони; Тапети за работен плот; Дигитално изкуството; Шаблони на документи; Шрифтове; Предварителни настройки и LUTs за редактиране на снимки; SVG и файлове за изрязване; Сток фотографски снимки и видеозаписи; Виртуална валута
fi: Ohjelmisto > Digitaaliset tuotteet ja valuutta: Tietokonekuvakkeet; Työpöydän taustakuvat; Digitaalinen taide; Asiakirjamallit; Fontit; Kuvankäsittelyn esiasetukset ja LUT-tiedostot; SVG- ja leikkuutiedostot; Kuvapankkikuvat ja -videot; Virtuaalivaluutta
pl: Oprogramowanie > Towary i waluty cyfrowe: Ikony; Tapety na pulpit; Cyfrowe prace plastyczne; Szablony dokumentów; Czcionki; Presety i pliki LUT do edycji zdjęć; Pliki SVG i pliki do wycinania; Zdjęcia i filmy stockowe; Waluty wirtualne
cs: Software > Digitální obsah a měna: Počítačové ikony; Tapety na plochu; Digitální výtvarná díla; Šablony dokumentů; Písma; Předvolby a LUT pro úpravu fotek; SVG a vyřezávací soubory; Fotografie pro fotobanky a videa pro videobanky; Virtuální měna
zh-TW: 軟體 > 數位商品和貨幣: 電腦圖示; 電腦版桌布; 數位藝術品; 文件範本; 字型; 相片編輯預設檔與 LUT; SVG 與切割檔案; 庫存相片和影片素材; 虛擬貨幣
vi: Phần mềm > Hàng hóa và đơn vị tiền tệ kỹ thuật số: Biểu tượng trong máy tính; Hình nền máy tính; Tác phẩm kỹ thuật số; Mẫu tài liệu; Phông chữ; Preset và LUT chỉnh sửa ảnh; SVG và tệp cắt; Kho hình ảnh và video có sẵn; Tiền ảo
de: Software > Digital-Content-Software: Computer-Icons; Desktop-Hintergrundbilder; Digitales Bildmaterial; Dokumentvorlagen; Fonts; Fotobearbeitungs-Presets & LUTs; SVG- & Plotterdateien; Stock-Fotografie & Videoclips; Virtuelles Geld
nl: Software > Software voor digitale inhoud: Computerpictogrammen; Bureaubladachtergronden; Digitale kunst; Documenttemplates; Lettertypen; Presets en LUT's voor fotobewerking; SVG- en snijbestanden; Stockfoto's en -videobeelden; Virtuele valuta
nb: Programvare > Digitale varer og valutaer: Datamaskinikoner; Skrivebordsbakgrunner; Digitale kunstverk; Dokumentmaler; Skrifttyper; Forhåndsinnstillinger for bilderedigering og LUT-er; SVG- og kuttefiler; Arkivfotografier og -video; Virtuelle valutaer
tr: Yazılım > Dijital Ürünler ve Elektronik Para: Bilgisayar Simgeleri; Masaüstü Duvar Kağıtları; Dijital Sanat Eseri; Belge Şablonları; Yazı Tipleri; Fotoğraf düzenleme ön ayarları ve LUT'lar; SVG ve kesim dosyaları; Stok Fotoğraflar ve Video Görüntüsü; Sanal Para
it: Software > Software contenuti digitali: Icone computer; Sfondi per il desktop; Opere d'arte digitali; Modelli di documenti; Font; Preset per fotoritocco e LUT; SVG e file di taglio; Foto e filmati stock; Valuta virtuale
es: Software > Bienes y moneda digitales: Iconos de computadora; Fondos de escritorio; Arte digital; Plantillas de documentos; Fuentes; Ajustes preestablecidos de edición de fotos y LUT; Archivos SVG y de corte; Fotografía y vídeo de stock; Moneda virtual
ja: ソフトウェア > デジタルコンテンツ・仮想通貨: アイコン; デスクトップ壁紙; デジタル アート; 文書テンプレート; フォント; 写真編集プリセットおよび LUT; SVG およびカットファイル; ストックフォト; 仮想通貨
en: Software > Digital Goods & Currency: Computer Icons; Desktop Wallpapers; Digital Artwork; Document Templates; Fonts; Photo Editing Presets & LUTs; SVG & Cut Files; Stock Photographs & Video Footage; Virtual Currency
sk-SK: Softvér > Digitálny tovar a mena: Počítačové ikony; Tapety na plochu; Digitálne umelecké dielo; Šablóny dokumentov; Písma; Predvoľby a LUT na úpravu fotografií; SVG a vyrezávacie súbory; Fotobanka a videozáznamy; Virtuálna mena
el: Λογισμικό > Ψηφιακά αγαθά & νομίσματα: Εικονίδια υπολογιστή; Ταπετσαρίες επιφάνειας εργασίας; Ψηφιακά έργα τέχνης; Πρότυπα εγγράφων; Γραμματοσειρές; Προεπιλογές επεξεργασίας φωτογραφιών και LUT; Αρχεία SVG και κοπής; Στοκ φωτογραφίες & βιντεοσκοπημένο υλικό; Εικονικό νόμισμα
pt-PT: Software > Moedas e bens digitais: Ícones de computador; Fundos de ambiente de trabalho; Arte digital; Modelos de documentos; Tipos de letra; Predefinições de edição de fotografia e LUT; SVG e ficheiros de corte; Fotografias e vídeos de banco de imagens; Moeda virtual
sv: Programvara > Digitala varor och valutor: Datorikoner; Skrivbordsbakgrund; Digigrafi; Dokumentmallar; Teckensnitt; Förinställningar och LUT-filer för fotoredigering; SVG- och skärfiler; Stockfoton; Virtuella valutor
zh-CN: 软件 > 数字商品与货币: 计算机图标; 桌面壁纸; 数字艺术品; 文件模板; 字体; 照片编辑预设和 LUT; SVG 和切割文件; 摄影/视频素材; 虚拟货币
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Digitalno blago in valuta: Računalniške ikone; Ozadja za namizje; Digitalna umetniška dela; Predloge dokumentov; Pisave; Prednastavitve za urejanje fotografij in LUT-i; SVG in datoteke za izrez; Fotografije in videoposnetki iz zbirke; Virtualna valuta
hr-HR: Softver > Digitalna dobra i valuta: Računalne ikone; Pozadine za radnu površinu; Digitalno umjetničko djelo; Predlošci dokumenata; Fontovi; Unaprijed zadane postavke i LUT-ovi za uređivanje fotografija; SVG i datoteke za rezanje; Licencirane fotografije i videozapisi; Virtualna valuta